Montana, session 2025, HB870.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Appropriation. (1) There is appropriated $120,000 from the general fund
to the department of justice in the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and in the fiscal year beginning July 1,
2026, to address recruitment and retention matters at the Montana state crime lab.
(2) Funds not expended must revert to the general fund.
(3) This appropriation is one-time-only.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 870